Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2382.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:

Req. No. 12393 Page 1

This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Making Oklahoma
Kids Healthy Again Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 241.5 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Department of Human Services shall adopt the following
measures to verify eligibility in the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program (SNAP):
1. The Department of Human Services shall enter into the
following data-matching agreements with state agencies to cross-
check households enrolled in SNAP with other state data sets:
a. the Department of Human Services shall enter into a
data-matching agreement with the Oklahoma Lottery
Commission and the Oklahoma Horse Racing Commission to
identify households with lottery or gambling winnings,
or a combination thereof, of Three Thousand Dollars
($3,000.00) or more and, to the extent permissible
under federal law, treat this data as verified upon
receipt. To the extent the data may not be verified
upon receipt, the Department of Human Services shall
make referrals for further investigation to identify
households with winnings equal to or greater than the
resource limit for elderly or disabled households, as
defined in 7 C.F.R., Section 273.8(b),
Req. No. 12393 Page 2

b. on at least a monthly basis, the Department of Human
Services shall receive and review information from the
State Department of Health concerning individuals in
households enrolled in SNAP that indicates a change in
circumstances that may affect eligibility for food
stamps, including, but not limited to, death records,
c. on at least a quarterly basis, the Department of Human
Services shall receive and review information from the
Oklahoma Employment Security Commission concerning
individuals in households enrolled in SNAP that
indicates a change in circumstances that may affect
eligibility for assistance, including, but not limited
to, changes in employment or wages,
d. on at least a semi-monthly basis, the Department of
Human Services shall receive and review information
from the Oklahoma Employment Security Commission
concerning individuals in households enrolled in SNAP
that indicates a change in circumstances that may
affect eligibility for assistance, including, but not
limited to, potential changes in employment, income,
or assets,
e. on at least a quarterly basis, the Department of Human
Services shall receive and review information from the
Oklahoma Tax Commission concerning individuals in
Req. No. 12393 Page 3

households enrolled in SNAP that indicates a change in
circumstances that may affect eligibility for
assistance, including, but not limited to, potential
changes in income, wages, or residency as identified
by tax records, and
f. on at least a monthly basis, the Department of Human
Services shall receive and review information from the
Department of Corrections concerning individuals in
households enrolled in SNAP that indicates a change in
circumstances that may affect eligibility;
2. On at least a monthly basis, the Department of Human
Services shall review agency records for information concerning
individuals in households enrolled in SNAP that indicates a change
in circumstances that may affect eligibility for assistance,
including, but not limited to, potential changes in residency as
identified by out-of-state electronic benefit transfer card
transactions; and
3. On at least a monthly basis, the Department of Human
Services shall, to assess continued eligibility and act on findings,
review:
a. earned income information, death register information,
incarceration records, supplemental security income
information, beneficiary records, earnings

Req. No. 12393 Page 4

information, and pension information maintained by the
United States Social Security Administration,
b. income and employment information maintained in the
National Directory of New Hires database and child
support enforcement data maintained by the United
States Department of Health and Human Services,
c. payment and earnings information maintained by the
United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development, and
d. national fleeing felon information maintained by the
United States Federal Bureau of Investigation.
B. All households receiving assistance shall be subject to
change reporting and report changes in circumstances, pursuant to 7
C.F.R., Section 273.12(a)(1), within ten (10) days of the date the
change becomes known to the household.
C. In no case shall categorical eligibility, pursuant to 7
U.S.C., Section 2014(a) or 273.2(j)(2)(iii), be granted for any
noncash, in-kind, or other benefit unless expressly required by
federal law for SNAP. The Department of Human Services shall not
apply gross income standards for SNAP higher than the standards
specified in 7 U.S.C., Section 2014(c), unless expressly required by
federal law. Categorical eligibility exempting households from such
gross income standards requirements shall not be granted for any

Req. No. 12393 Page 5

nonc ash, in-kind, or other benefit, unless expressly required by
federal law.
D. The Department of Human Services shall, with all necessary
coordination with appropriate law enforcement authorities,
including, but not limited to, the Federal Bureau of Investigation,
the Office of the Attorney General, the Office of Inspector General,
and local law enforcement entities, conduct an on-site inspection of
authorized retailers which accept Electronic Benefits Transfer (EBT)
card transactions to identify suspicious transaction records or
amounts indicating possible trafficking of benefits or other
criminal conduct and make referrals for proper investigations under
applicable law.
E. On at least a quarterly basis, the Department of Human
Services shall make available to the public on its website data from
findings of noncompliance and fraud investigations in SNAP for the
following aggregate and nonconfidential and non-personally
identifiable information:
a. the number of households investigated for intentional
program violations or fraud,
b. total number of households referred to the Office of
the Attorney General for prosecution,
c. improper payments and expenditures,
d. monies recovered,

Req. No. 12393 Page 6

e. aggregate data concerning improper payments and
ineligible recipients as a percentage of those
investigated and reviewed, and
f. aggregate amount of funds expended by electronic
benefit transfer card transactions in each state
outside of Oklahoma.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
The Legislature finds that:
1. The Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) was
created to provide nutritional support to low-income individuals and
families to reduce food insecurity;
2. A significant portion of SNAP funds is currently spent on
nonnutritive items such as soft drinks and candy, which contribute
to obesity, diabetes, and other chronic diseases, disproportionately
affecting low-income communities;
3. The United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) has
documented that sugar-sweetened beverages are among the most
commonly purchased items using SNAP benefits, undermining the
program’s goal of promoting healthier food choices; and
4. Reducing the purchase of nonnutritive food items with SNAP
benefits will enhance public health, reduce long-term healthcare
costs, and align the program with its original purpose of improving
food security through nutritious food access.
Req. No. 12393 Page 7

SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 241.6 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Department of Human Services is hereby directed
to submit a request to the United States Department of Agriculture
Food and Nutrition Service for a waiver to exclude the following
categories of items from being eligible for purchase using
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) benefits within the
state of Oklahoma:
1. Candy, as defined in Section 1352 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes; and
2. Soft drinks, as defined in Section 1352 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
B. The waiver request shall include:
1. Justification for excluding candy and soft drinks from SNAP
purchases based on public health and economic impacts;
2. A proposed implementation plan, including retailer
compliance, participant education, and enforcement mechanisms; and
3. Any additional supporting data demonstrating the need for
this reform.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 241.7 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 12393 Page 8

A. Upon federal approval of the waiver request, the Oklahoma
Department of Human Services shall:
1. Develop and issue guidance to retailers authorized by the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) regarding the
exclusion of candy and soft drinks from eligible purchases;
2. Conduct public outreach and education efforts to inform SNAP
recipients about the change and encourage healthier purchasing
choices;
3. Partner with public health agencies and community
organizations to support nutrition education and access to
affordable, healthy food options; and
4. Monitor and enforce compliance with the waiver requirements
among participating retailers.
B. The Department shall submit an annual report to the
Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate,
and the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives detailing:
1. The implementation status of the waiver;
2. Any challenges encountered in enforcement and compliance;
and
3. The public health and economic impacts observed as a result
of this policy change.
SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12393 CMA 02/19/25
Req. No. 12393 Page 9

























Req. No. 12393 Page 10